Utah statutes.
49-11-902.   Premium tax revenues -- Formula -- Deposits.

(1)  If the premium tax revenue received by the office under Subsection 49-11-901.5(1) and first paid in accordance with Subsections 49-11-901.5(2)(a) and (b), including any remaining amount, the office shall deposit the amount in the:

(a)  Public Safety Contributory Trust Fund created under Section 49-14-104; and

(b)  Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Trust Fund created under Section 49-15-104.

(2)  The money deposited under this section shall be used to fund an increase for retirees in the public safety retirement systems from a 2.5% maximum annual cost-of-living adjustment to a 4% maximum annual cost-of-living adjustment under Sections 49-14-403 and 49-15-403 in the public safety retirement systems.

(3)  As required to implement this section, the office shall make the calculations and deposits for the equitable apportionment of money between:

(a)  Division A1 and B1; and

(b)  the contributory and noncontributory trust funds.

